Hawaii, session 2025, HB1329.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature recognizes that in the United States of America and the State of Hawaii, our government is of the people, by the people, and for the people. It is therefore essential for governmental officials to communicate with the people and the legislators elected to serve the people.  The legislature also recognizes that, unfortunately, governmental officials do not always live up to this ideal.  The legislature believes that action is necessary to ensure that governmental officials inform the people and their elected public servants about matters that will impact their communities. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to require any state or county departments pursuing any major plan or work effort that is likely to significantly affect members of any community to: (1)  Conduct a public hearing on the issue, and post notices on the department's website; and (2)  Send direct notices of the public hearing to state and county elected officials who have constituents in the community. SECTION 2.  Chapter 26, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to part II be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§26- Community issues; public hearings; notifications.  (a)  Any department of the State pursuing any major plan or work effort that is likely to significantly affect members of any community within the State shall: (1)  Conduct a public hearing on the issue; (2)  Post a notice of the public hearing on the department's website; and (3)  Send direct notices of the public hearing, via mail and electronic mail, to the offices of: (A)  The governor; (B)  The mayor of the county in which the community is located; (C)  Any members of the state senate who have constituents in the affected community; (D)  Any members of the state house of representatives who have constituents in the affected community; or (E)  Any members of a county council who have constituents in the affected community. (b)  For the purposes of this section, each public hearing shall be open to the general public without charge." SECTION 3.  Chapter 46, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to part I be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§46- Community issues; public hearings; notifications.  (a)  Any department of any county of the State pursuing any major plan or work effort that is likely to significantly affect members of any community within the county shall: (1)  Conduct a public hearing on the issue; (2)  Post a notice of the public hearing on the department's website; and (3)  Send direct notices of the public hearing, via mail and electronic mail, to the offices of: (A)  The governor; (B)  The mayor of the county; (C)  Any members of the state senate who have constituents in the affected community; (D)  Any members of the state house of representatives who have constituents in the affected community; or (E)  Any members of the county council who have constituents in the affected community. (b)  For the purposes of this section, each public hearing shall be open to the general public without charge." SECTION 4.  This Act does not affect rights and duties that matured, penalties that were incurred, and proceedings that were begun before its effective date. SECTION 5.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 6.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________